Utah statutes.
62A-2-110.   Exclusions from chapter.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:

(1)  a facility or program owned or operated by an agency of the United States government;

(2)  a facility or program operated by or under an exclusive contract with the Department of Corrections;

(3) unless required otherwise by a contract with the department, individual or group counseling by a mental health professional licensed under Title 58, Chapter 60, Mental Health Professional Practice Act;

(4)  a general acute hospital, small health care facility, specialty hospital, nursing care facility, or other health care facility licensed by the Department of Health under Title 26, Chapter 21, Health Care Facility Licensing and Inspection Act; or

(5)  a boarding school.

